apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="ur__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arnas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="åk/er__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erns</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rars</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarnas</l>    <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lux__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kum/mel__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>mel</l>       <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mels</l>      <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lets</l>      <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mel</l>       <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mels</l>      <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lens</l>      <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="driv/e__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arnas</l>     <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ism__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="faderv/år__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>år</l>        <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>års</l>       <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>år</l>        <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>året</l>      <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>års</l>       <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rets</l>      <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>årets</l>     <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>år</l>        <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>års</l>       <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åren</l>      <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rens</l>      <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>årens</l>     <r>år<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="futur/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umets</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="drive">           <i>driv</i><par n="driv/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hertz">           <i>hertz</i><par n="lux__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kummel">          <i>kum</i><par n="kum/mel__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="stenkummel">      <i>stenkum</i><par n="kum/mel__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="lux">             <i>lux</i><par n="lux__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="muffins">         <i>muffins</i><par n="lux__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gravkummel">      <i>gravkum</i><par n="kum/mel__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="gauss">           <i>gauss</i><par n="lux__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hammerless">      <i>hammerless</i><par n="lux__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="siemens">         <i>siemens</i><par n="lux__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kretinism">       <i>kretinism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="panteism">        <i>panteism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="konfessionalism"> <i>konfessionalism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="positivism">      <i>positivism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stalinism">       <i>stalinism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="chauvinism">      <i>chauvinism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fadervår">        <i>faderv</i><par n="faderv/år__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="arianism">        <i>arianism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dimorfism">       <i>dimorfism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="primitivism">     <i>primitivism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="behaviorism">     <i>behaviorism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="imperialism">     <i>imperialism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="geotropism">      <i>geotropism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nykterism">       <i>nykterism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="byråkratism">     <i>byråkratism</i><par n="ism__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="futurum">         <i>futur</i><par n="futur/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="preteritum">      <i>preterit</i><par n="futur/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="banvagn">         <i>banvagn</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="underarm">        <i>underarm</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gerundivum">      <i>gerundiv</i><par n="futur/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="stjärnhop">       <i>stjärnhop</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="åkersork">        <i>åkersork</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mentalvård">      <i>mentalvård</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nervtråd">        <i>nervtråd</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="supinum">         <i>supin</i><par n="futur/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="gerundium">       <i>gerundi</i><par n="futur/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kitteldal">       <i>kitteldal</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="promenadseger">   <i>promenadseg</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="blåsorkester">    <i>blåsorkest</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hängning">        <i>hängning</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kasperteater">    <i>kasperteat</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="seger">           <i>seg</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lagkappsimning">  <i>lagkappsimning</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="komminister">     <i>komminist</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="diameter">        <i>diamet</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="minimitermometer"><i>minimitermomet</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="avtvagning">      <i>avtvagning</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="atomvinter">      <i>atomvint</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="scooter">         <i>scoot</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="torkning">        <i>torkning</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="rolighetsminister"><i>rolighetsminist</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="västerbottning">  <i>västerbottning</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="utrikesminister"> <i>utrikesminist</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="intumning">       <i>intumning</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="blunder">         <i>blund</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="persvadering">    <i>persvadering</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="amfiteater">      <i>amfiteat</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="minister">        <i>minist</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="namnteckning">    <i>namnteckning</i><par n="ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bromscylinder">   <i>bromscylind</i><par n="åk/er__n_ut"/></e>
